Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-2423
Informal appointment proceedings; notice requirements.

The moving party must give notice as described by section 30-2220 of his intention to seek an appointment informally: (1) to any person demanding it pursuant to section 30-2413; and (2) to any person having a prior or equal right to appointment not waived in writing and filed with the court. No other notice of an informal appointment proceeding is required, except as provided in section 30-2420(c) or in section 30-2483.

Laws 1974, LB 354, § 101, UPC § 3-310.